Mississippi, session 2026, SB2903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-11-112, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-11-112.  (1)  Any member who * * * became a member of the system before March 1, 2026, and is receiving a retirement allowance for service or disability retirement, or any beneficiary thereof, who has received a monthly benefit for at least one (1) full fiscal year, shall be eligible to receive an additional benefit, on December 1 or July 1 of the year as provided in subsection (3) of this section, equal to an amount calculated under paragraph (a) or (b) below: (a)  For any member who became a member of the system before July 1, 2011, the sum of: (i)  An amount equal to three percent (3%) of the annual retirement allowance multiplied by the number of full fiscal years in retirement before the end of the fiscal year in which the member reaches age fifty-five (55), plus (ii)  An additional amount equal to three percent (3%) compounded by the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age fifty-five (55), multiplied by the amount of the annual retirement allowance. (b)  For any member who became a member of the system on or after July 1, 2011, but before March 1, 2026, the sum of: (i)  An amount equal to three percent (3%) of the annual retirement allowance multiplied by the number of full fiscal years in retirement before the end of the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60), plus (ii)  An additional amount equal to three percent (3%) compounded by the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60), multiplied by the amount of the annual retirement allowance. (c)  Any member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, shall receive an amount as calculated under paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), except that such amount shall not exceed Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) in any year. Every three (3) years, the Legislature may evaluate whether the maximum dollar amount provided in this paragraph (c) shall be raised due to the rate of inflation. (2)  The calculation of the beneficiary's additional benefit under subsection (1) * * *(a) or (b) of this section shall be based on the member's age and full fiscal years in retirement as if the member had lived. (3)  (a)  The additional benefit provided for under this section shall be paid in one (1) payment in December of each year to those persons who are receiving a retirement allowance on December 1 of that year, unless an election is made under this subsection. However, if a retiree who is receiving a retirement allowance that will terminate upon the retiree's death is receiving the additional benefit in one (1) payment and dies on or after July 1 but before December 1, the beneficiary designated on the retirement application, if any, shall receive in a single payment a fractional part of the additional benefit based on the number of months in which a retirement allowance was received during the fiscal year. Likewise, if a retiree is receiving a retirement allowance that will terminate upon his or her death in two (2) to six (6) monthly installments, any remaining payments of the additional benefit will be paid in a lump sum to the beneficiary designated on the application, or if none, pursuant to Section 25-11-117.1(1). Any similar remaining payments of additional benefits payable under this section to a deceased beneficiary who was receiving a monthly benefit shall be payable in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-11-117.1(2).  If the additional monthly benefit is being received in one (1) payment, the additional benefit shall also be prorated based on the number of months in which a retirement allowance was received during the fiscal year when (i) the monthly benefit payable to a beneficiary terminates due to the expiration of an option, remarriage or cessation of dependent status or due to the retiree's return to covered employment, and (ii) the monthly benefit terminates on or after July 1 and before December 1.  The board may, in its discretion, allow a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional annual payment in the manner provided for in this paragraph to change the manner in which the additional annual payment is received to that provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection if the retired member or beneficiary submits satisfactory documentation that the continued receipt of the additional annual payment as provided for in this paragraph will cause a financial hardship to the retired member or beneficiary. (b)  Retired members or beneficiaries thereof who on July 1, 1999, or July 1 of any fiscal year thereafter, are receiving a retirement allowance, may elect by an irrevocable agreement in writing filed in the Office of the Public Employees' Retirement System no less than thirty (30) days before July 1 of the appropriate year, to begin receiving the additional benefit provided for under this section in twelve (12) equal monthly installments beginning July 1, 1999, or July 1 of any fiscal year thereafter.  This irrevocable agreement shall be binding on the member and subsequent beneficiaries.  Payment of those monthly installments shall not extend beyond the month in which a retirement allowance is due and payable.  The board may, in its discretion, allow a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional annual payment in the manner provided for in this paragraph to change the manner in which the additional annual payment is received to that provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection if the retired member or beneficiary submits satisfactory documentation that the continued receipt of the additional annual payment as provided for in this paragraph will cause a financial hardship to the retired member or beneficiary. (4)  The additional payment or payments provided for under this section are for the fiscal year in which they are paid. (5)  (a)  The amount provided for under subsection (1) (a)(ii) of this section is calculated using the following formula: [(1.03)n - 1] x [annual retirement allowance], where n is the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age fifty-five (55). (b)  The amount provided for under subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section is calculated using the following formula: [(1.03)n - 1] x [annual retirement allowance], where n is the number of full fiscal years in retirement beginning with the fiscal year in which the member reaches age sixty (60). (6)  Any retired member or beneficiary thereof who has previously elected to receive the additional annual payment in monthly installments may elect, upon application on a form prescribed by the board of trustees, to have that payment made in one (1) additional payment each year.  This written election must be filed in the Office of the Public Employees' Retirement System before June 1, 2000, and shall be effective for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2000. (7)  In the event of death of a retired member or a beneficiary thereof who is receiving the additional annual payment in two (2) to six (6) monthly installments pursuant to an election made before July 1, 1999, and who would otherwise be eligible to receive the additional benefit provided for under this section in one (1) payment in December of the current fiscal year, any remaining amounts shall be paid in a lump sum to the designated beneficiary. (8)  When a member retires after July 1 and has previously received a retirement allowance for one or more full fiscal years, the retired member shall be eligible immediately for the additional benefit.  The additional benefit shall be based on the current retirement allowance and the number of full fiscal years in retirement and shall be prorated and paid in monthly installments based on the number of months a retirement allowance is paid during the fiscal year. * * * (9)  A member who became a member of the system on or after March 1, 2026, is not entitled to the additional annual benefit under this section; however, the Legislature may provide an additional benefit for a specific year. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after March 1, 2026.